Utah statutes.
65A-1-11.   Division's authority to examine records and inspect premises.

(1)  For the purpose of determining compliance with any rule or any performance or payment obligation under a lease, permit, or contract, the division may, at reasonable times, places, and intervals:

(a)  require that the lessee, permittee, or contractor provide any pertinent books, records, or other documents of the lessee, permittee, or contractor; or

(b)  inspect the property acquired, used, or developed under the lease, permit, or contract after reasonable notice or as provided in the lease, permit, or contract.

(2)  Nothing in the section shall be construed to limit or invalidate audits conducted by the division prior to the effective date of this act.



Enacted by Chapter 325, 1990 General Session

